Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-505
Ordinances, rules, and regulations; enactment; enforcement.

In addition to their special powers, cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to make all such ordinances, bylaws, rules, regulations, and resolutions, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, as may be expedient for maintaining the peace, good government, and welfare of the corporation and its trade, commerce, and manufactories, and to enforce all ordinances by inflicting fines or penalties for the breach thereof, not exceeding five hundred dollars for any one offense, recoverable with costs.

Laws 1879, § 69, XII, p. 213;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XII, p. 175;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XII, p. 166;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XII, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 5106;

C.S.1922, § 4279;

C.S.1929, § 17-428;

R.S.1943, § 17-505;

Laws 1999, LB 128, § 2.

Municipality may enact ordinance imposing duty on gas company of keeping in repair and maintaining all pipelines. Clough v. North Central Gas Co., 150 Neb. 418, 34 N.W.2d 862 (1948).

Cities of the second class have power to make ordinances that punish operators of motor vehicles on city streets. Gembler v. City of Seward, 136 Neb. 196, 285 N.W. 542 (1939), modified on rehearing 136 Neb. 916, 288 N.W. 545 (1939).

Powers conferred upon villages and cities are not extended to board of health. State v. Temple, 99 Neb. 505, 156 N.W. 1063 (1916).

Payment of occupation tax under prior ordinance would not prevent prosecution for engaging in operation of billiard and pool room under later ordinance requiring a license. McCarter v. City of Lexington, 80 Neb. 714, 115 N.W. 303 (1908).

Municipality may grant the use of its streets to telephone company for its poles and lines, which right is a public use and not a special privilege, and, when company makes expenditures relying on an ordinance granting such use, city authorities cannot subsequently impose additional arbitrary burdens. City of Plattsmouth v. Nebraska Telephone Co., 80 Neb. 460, 114 N.W. 588 (1908).

Ordinance attempting to make it unlawful to keep any card table or permit card playing in any place of business was not authorized by this section. In re Sapp, 79 Neb. 781, 113 N.W. 261 (1907).

Village boards have power by ordinance to license and regulate billiard and pool rooms. Morgan v. State, 64 Neb. 369, 90 N.W. 108 (1902).

Village cannot enforce its ordinances both by fine and imprisonment, nor by imprisonment alone except as a means of enforcing the payment of the fine. Bailey v. State of Nebraska, 30 Neb. 855, 47 N.W. 208 (1890).